pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Artigos para o lar > Utensílios e cuidado de calçado > Calçadeiras e auxiliares para calçar > Auxiliares para vestir: Ganchos para botões; Bastões para vestir; Auxiliares para calçar meias; Acessórios para puxadores de fecho de correr
fr: Maison et jardin > Produits ménagers > Entretien et accessoires pour chaussures > Chausse-pieds et aide à l’habillage > Aides à l’habillage: Crochets à bouton; Bâtons d'habillage; Aides pour chaussettes; Aides pour fermeture éclair
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家居用品 > 鞋类保养/工具 > 鞋拔/穿衣辅助用品 > 穿衣辅助用品: 穿扣器; 穿衣杆; 穿袜辅助器; 拉链头
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Suprimentos domésticos > Manutenção e ferramentas para sapatos > Calçadeiras > Auxiliares para calçar: Ganchos para botões; Bastões de vestir; Auxiliares para calçar meias; Auxiliares para puxadores de zíper
en: Home & Garden > Household Supplies > Shoe Care & Tools > Shoe Horns & Dressing Aids > Dressing Aids: Button Hooks; Dressing Sticks; Sock Aids; Zipper Pull Aids
es: Casa y jardín > Productos del hogar > Cuidado del calzado > Calzadores > Ayudas para vestirse: Ganchos abrochabotones; Varas de ayuda para vestirse; Calzador de calcetines; Adaptadores de cremalleras
sv: Hem och trädgård > Hushållsutrustning > Skovård och skoverktyg > Skohorn och påklädningshjälpmedel > Påklädningshjälpmedel: Knappkrokar; Påklädningspinnar; Strumphjälpmedel; Dragkedjehjälpmedel
nb: Hjem og hage > Husholdningsartikler > Skopleie og -verktøy > Skojern og påkledningshjelp > Hjelpemidler for påkledning: Knappekroker; Påkledningspinner; Sokkehjelpemidler; Hjelpemidler til glidelåslukking
ru: Дом и сад > Хозяйственные товары > Товары для ухода за обувью > Рожки для обуви и приспособления для надевания > Приспособления для надевания обуви: Бытовые крючки; Палочки для перекуса; Носки-помощники; Бегунки для молний
nl: Huis en tuin > Huishoudelijke benodigdheden > Schoenverzorging > Schoenlepels > Hulpmiddelen voor aantrekken: Knoophaken; Aankleedstokken; Sokkenaantrekkers; Ritstrekker hulpstukken
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Είδη οικιακής χρήσης > Είδη & εργαλεία περιποίησης υποδημάτων > Κουτάλια υποδημάτων & βοηθήματα ένδυσης > Βοηθήματα ένδυσης: Γάντζοι κουμπιών; Ράβδοι ένδυσης; Βοηθήματα για κάλτσες; Βοηθήματα έλξης φερμουάρ
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Sarf Malzemeleri > Ayakkabı Bakım ve Aletleri > Keratalar ve Giyim Yardımcıları > Giyim Yardımcıları: Ahşap Kancalar; Sos Çubukları; Çorap Giydirme Aparatları; Fermuar Çekme Aparatları
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Potrepštine za kućanstvo > Njega cipela i dodaci > Žlice za cipele i pomagala za oblačenje > Pomagala za oblačenje: Kuke za gumbe; Štapovi za odijevanje; Pomagala za čarape; Pomagala za povlačenje zatvarača
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Namų apyvokos reikmenys > Batų priežiūra ir įrankiai > Batų šaukštai ir pagalbinės apsiavimo priemonės > Pagalbinės apsiavimo priemonės: Sagų kabliukai; Rengimosi lazdelės; Pagalbinė priemonė kojinėms užsimauti; Užtrauktukų liežuvėlių priedai
it: Casa e giardino > Forniture domestiche > Cura delle scarpe > Calzascarpe e ausili per vestirsi > Ausili per vestirsi: pulsante Hooks; Bastoncini per condimento; Aiuti per calzini; Tiretti per cerniera
pl: Dom i ogród > Artykuły gospodarstwa domowego > Środki i narzędzia do pielęgnacji obuwia > Łyżki do butów i pomoce do ubierania > Pomoce do ubierania: Haczyki na guziki; Drążki do zdejmowania odzieży; Pomoce do ściągania skarpetek; Uchwyty do zamków błyskawicznych
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 日用品 > 靴のお手入れ > 靴べら・ドレッシングエイド > ドレッシングエイド: ボタンフック; ドレッシングスティック; ソックスエイド; ファスナー補助具
cs: Dům a zahrada > Potřeby pro domácnosti > Pomůcky pro péči o obuv > Nazouvací lžíce > Pomůcky pro oblékání: Háčky na knoflíky; Pomůcky pro oblékání; Pomůcky pro oblékání ponožek; Pomůcky pro zapínání zipů
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Gospodinjski pripomočki > Nega obutve in orodja > Žlice za čevlje in pripomočki za obuvanje > Pripomočki za oblačenje: Zanke za gumbe; Palčke za oblačenje; Pripomočki za nogavice; Dodatki za zadrge
da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsartikler > Skopleje og redskaber > Skohorn og påklædningshjælpemidler > Påklædningshjælpemidler: Knappekroge; Påklædningspinde; Strømpepåtagere; Lynlåsgreb
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Produse de uz casnic > Produse și instrumente pentru îngrijirea încălțămintei > Încălțătoare și accesorii pentru încălțat > Accesorii pentru încălțat: Cârlige pentru încheiat nasturi; Dispozitive de îmbrăcare cu cârlig; Dispozitive pentru încălțat șosete; Dispozitive de tras fermoarul
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsbedarf > Schuhpflege > Schuhanzieher > Anziehhilfen: Knopfhaken; Ankleidestöcke; Sockenanziehhilfe; Reißverschluss-Ziehhilfen
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Битови консумативи > Грижа за обувки и пособия > Обувалки и помощни средства за обличане > Помощни средства за обличане: Куки за копчета; Пръчки за обличане; Помощни средства за чорапи; Плъзгачи за ципове
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 생활용품 > 신발 관리 도구 > 신발 주걱/착복용품 > 착복용품: 단추 걸이; 의복 착용 보조봉; 양말 착용 보조기; 지퍼 풀 보조 도구
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 居家生活用品 > 鞋子保養工具 > 鞋拔和穿衣輔助器 > 穿衣輔助器: 按鈕掛鉤; 穿衣輔助棒; 穿襪輔助器; 拉鍊助拉器
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kotitaloustarvikkeet > Kenkien hoito ja välineet > Kenkälusikat ja pukeutumisen apuvälineet > Pukeutumisen apuvälineet: Nappikoukut; Pukeutumiskoukut; Sukka-apuvälineet; Vetoketjun vetimet
th: บ้านและสวน > อุปกรณ์ใช้ในบ้าน > เครื่องมือและการดูแลรองเท้า > ช้อนใส่รองเท้าและอุปกรณ์ช่วยแต่งตัว > เครื่องช่วยแต่งตัว: ตะขอ; ไม้ช่วยแต่งตัว; อุปกรณ์ช่วยสวมถุงเท้า; อุปกรณ์ช่วยดึงซิป
hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartási kellékek > Cipőápolás és -eszközök > Cipőkanalak és öltözködési segédeszközök > Öltözködési segédeszközök: Gombhúzók; Öltözőpálcikák; Zokni segédeszközök; Cipzárhúzó segédeszközök
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Potreby pre domácnosť > Nástroje na starostlivosť o obuv > Obuváky a pomôcky pri obliekaní > Pomôcky pri obliekaní: Háčiky na gombíky; Tyče na obliekanie; Pomôcky na ponožky; Pomôcky na zapínanie zipsu
vi: Nhà và vườn > Sản phẩm gia dụng > Dụng cụ chăm sóc giày > Gậy hỗ trợ mặc áo và sừng giúp cởi giày > Gậy hỗ trợ mặc áo: Dụng cụ cài cúc; Gậy hỗ trợ mặc đồ; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ đi tất; Dụng Cụ Kéo Khóa